Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium
beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations, Gaming
Enforcement and Office of
the State Fire Marshal ............. $214,836,486
(2) Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement ............................. $ 11,379,917
(3) Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner ............ $ 64,860,950
(4) Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services .... $ 95,970,176
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  State
Police, for the following purposes:
(1) Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations, Gaming
Enforcement and Office of
the State Fire Marshal ............. $ 97,487,875
(2) Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement ............................. $ 33,814,574
(3) Forensic Services and
Chief Medical Examiner ............ $ 2,598,272
(4) Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services .... $ 32,492,516
Enrolled House Bill 5028 (HB 5028-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Police for
the following purposes:
(1) Patrol Services, Criminal
Investigations and Office of
the State Fire Marshal ............. $ 1,883,075
(2) Fish and Wildlife
Enforcement ............................. $ 2,676,650
(3) Forensic Services ...................... $ 3,808,192
(4) Administrative Services,
Agency Support and Criminal
Justice Information Services .... $ 5,447,730
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$11,068,651 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from moneys allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
the Department of State Police for fish and wildlife enforcement activities.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 568, Oregon Laws  2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for patrol  services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and the office of the State  Fire Marshal, is increased by $268,200 for the state’s
share of federally reimbursable wildfire expenses incurred during the 2020 wildfires.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5028 (HB 5028-A) Page 2